Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.182

Annexation of unincorporated island of territory—Resolution—Notice of hearing.

(1) The legislative body of a city or town planning under chapter 36.70A RCW as of June 30, 1994, may resolve to annex territory to the city or town if there is, within the city or town, unincorporated territory containing residential property owners within the same county and within the same urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110 as the city or town:

(a) Containing less than one hundred acres and having at least eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the city or town; or

(b) Of any size and having at least eighty percent of the boundaries of the area contiguous to the city if the area existed before June 30, 1994.

(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be annexed, state the number of voters residing in the area as nearly as may be, and set a date for a public hearing on the resolution for annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the resolution at least once a week for two weeks before the date of the hearing in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the city or town and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be annexed.

(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, territory bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is considered contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or other body of water.

[ 1998 c 286 s 1; 1997 c 429 s 37.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 429: See note following RCW 36.70A.3201.